Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.441

Transfer of moneys from certain school bond and state building construction accounts and funds to general fund—Payment of warrants.

After July 24, 1983, all moneys to the credit of any fund or account described in the sections being repealed by sections 1 and 4, chapter 189, Laws of 1983 and all moneys thereafter paid to the state treasurer for or to the credit of such fund or account shall be transferred to the general fund. After July 24, 1983, any warrant drawn on any fund or account described in the sections being repealed by sections 1 and 4, chapter 189, Laws of 1983 and not presented for payment shall be paid from the general fund, and the state treasurer shall pay such warrants when presented from the general fund.

[ 1983 c 189 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 189: See note following RCW 82.24.260.